src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/noun_stems.lexc
! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
@R.pos.NOUN@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VAI@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

! When working with the lexicon, be sure to know the following lexical information:
! 1. Does it take the /-im/ suffix when possessed? If so, use NA_IM or NI_IM
! 2. Does the word take a short person prefix? If so, put %^SP at the beginning of the stem
! 3. What allomorphy does the stem undergo? If it takes oh-, put h at the beginning of the stem. If i -> o, use i3. If a -> i2, use a4. 
! If a -> o, use a3. 
! 4. Everything else should be accounted for in the phonology

! niksíssta

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.class.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_NA_STEMS
! Test Stems
! nohkówa:ohkó                NAD ;
! naaáhsa:maaáhs              NAD ;
nitána:itán                 NAD ;
! niksíssta:iksísst           NAD ;
! Full list
naaáhsa:maaáhs	NAD ;
naakiaaahsa:aakiaaahs	NAD ;
náákiima:áákiim	NAD ;
náwahkahtaana:áwahkahtaan	NAD ;
ni'sa:i's	NAD ;
ni'sohkiimaana:i'sohkiimaan	NAD ;
niihkawawa:iihkawa	NAD ;
niihsissa:iihsiss	NAD ;
nikííhtsimaana:ikííhtsimaan	NAD ;
niksimmotsiima:iksimmotsiim	NAD ;
niksíssta:iksísst	NAD ;
nikso'kowa:ikso'kowa	NAD ;
nimssa:imss	NAD ;
ninaaáhsa:inaaáhs	NAD ;
ninaapiima:inaapiim	NAD ;
ninna:inn	NAD ;
nínssta:ínsst	NAD ;
nippitaama:ippitaam	NAD ;
nisahkínaima:isahkínaim	NAD ;
nisahkómaapiima:isahkómaapiim	NAD ;
nissa:iss	NAD ;
nisskána:isskán	NAD ;
nissohkiimaana:issohkiimaan	NAD ;
nissohkowa:issohko	NAD ;
níssoko'sa:íssoko's	NAD ;
nissotana:issotan	NAD ;
nisstamowa:isstamo	NAD ;
nisstamoohkowa:isstamoohko	NAD ;
nitana:itan	NAD ;
niitsistowahsina:niitsistowahsin	NAD ;
nohkówa:ohkó	NAD ;
nohpapiiyihpa:ohpapiiyihp	NAD ;
nohpatooma:ohpatoom	NAD ;
noko'sa:oko's	NAD ;
nokoksissta:okoksisst	NAD ;
nokonna:okonn	NAD ;
nomahkinaima:omahkinaim	NAD ;
nooma:oom	NAD ;
nootoohkiimaana:ootoohkiimaan	NAD ;
nitohkiimaana:ohkiimaan	NAD ;
nootoyooma:ootoyoom	NAD ;
noppitaama:oppitaam	NAD ;
nóta'sa:óta's	NAD ;
noyínnaawa:oyínnaa	NAD ;
nisskáni'taama:sskáni'taam	NAD ;
niyiihkowa:yiihkowa	NAD ;
niistó:iistó NAD ;

LEXICON DEP_NI_STEMS
nookóówayi:ookóówan     NID ;
nookóówayi:ookóówa     NID ;
